Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.921

Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination that was commenced before July 22, 2001, is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

[ 2001 c 65 s 404.]